Utah statutes.
72-2-104.   Budget.

(1)  The department shall prepare and submit to the governor, to be included in his budget to be submitted to the Legislature, a budget of the requirements for the operation of the department for the fiscal year following the convening of the Legislature.

(2)  This budget shall be so separated, in relation to the various functions of the department, so as to allow the separate determination of funds for deposit into the Transportation Fund and into any other special funds which are required by law to be utilized for specific purposes and which are separately maintained by the department for those purposes.

